Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
Additional Personnel

30A.300.
Secretaries for Circuit Courts and District Courts.

Each Circuit Judge may appoint a secretary for his circuit.

Each secretary shall serve at the pleasure of the judge.

The secretary shall meet the qualifications for the position established by the Judicial Personnel System.

The secretary shall be compensated according to the salary schedule established for such positions in the Judicial Personnel System.

Where there is a documented and demonstrable need for secretarial services for a District Court, the Chief District Judge may request the Chief Justice to authorize the employment of a secretary or secretaries by the Chief District Judge, either on a permanent or temporary basis.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 46, effective March 19, 1977.

30A.310.
Authorization for appointment or employment of court personnel.

The Chief Justice, through the Administrative Office of the Courts, may authorize the appointment or employment by the chief judge of such secretaries, court reporters, interpreters, court administrators, friends of the court, and other personnel demonstrated as being necessary to the proper and efficient operation of the Court of Justice or any court which is a component thereof. Persons so authorized to be employed or appointed shall be compensated and classified according to the Judicial Personnel System.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 22, § 47, effective March 19, 1977.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Inasmuch as the chief justice, through the administrative office of the courts, has the power to promulgate personnel policies relating to the judicial personnel system, the hours requirement applicable to state employees generally has no application to judicial personnel.

OAG 77-740

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Caldwell’s Kentucky Form Book, 5th Ed., Practice Context for Stenographers and Interpreters, § 20.00.